Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1752.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 13, chapter 34, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 13-3402.01, to read: START_STATUTE13-3402.01. Possession and sale of mescaline for commercial use or research; classification; definitions A. A person shall not knowingly harvest, process or make available mescaline for commercial use or research, regardless of the industry. B. In a prosecution for a violation of this section, it is a defense that the mescaline is being used or is intended for use in connection with the bona fide practice of a religious belief, as an integral part of a religious exercise and in a manner not dangerous to public health, safety or morals. C. A person who violates this section is guilty of a class 4 felony. D. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Commercial use" means any use of or transaction involving intellectual property, goods, services or property and the use or transaction is intended for financial gain, profit or business-related purposes. 2. "Mescaline" means the drug that is listed in section 13-3401, paragraph 6, subdivision (a), item (xxi). 3. "REsearch" includes investigating, studying and experimenting for medical and pharmaceutical applications or uses. END_STATUTE